Hawaii statutes.
§712-1249 Promoting a detrimental drug in
the third degree. (1) A person commits the offense of promoting a
detrimental drug in the third degree if the person knowingly possesses any
marijuana or any Schedule V substance in any amount.

(2) Promoting a detrimental drug in the third
degree is a petty misdemeanor. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1975, c 163, §6(k);
gen ch 1993]

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §§712-1241 TO 712-1250

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, amended §§712-1241(1) and
712-1242(1) by placing possession and distribution of methamphetamine in the
sections, giving the court the discretion to impose probation and drug
treatment when appropriate. Act 231 removed possession and distribution of
methamphetamine from the methamphetamine trafficking statutes [by amending §§712-1240.7
and 712-1240.9 and repealing §712-1240.8]. The amendments implemented
recommendations made by the Penal Code Review Committee convened pursuant to
House Concurrent Resolution No. 155, S.D. 1 (2015). The Penal Code Review Committee
commented, on page 59 of its report, that "[w]hile the Committee
recognizes these dangers and challenges, it is of the opinion that the current
Methamphetamine Trafficking statutes are not properly addressing those
challenges and should be changed based on the experience of the Committee
regarding the application of these provisions in the criminal justice system in
Hawaii." House Standing Committee Report No. 660-16.

Law Journals and Reviews

The Protection of Individual Rights Under Hawai‘i's
Constitution. 14 UH L. Rev. 311 (1992).

Privacy Outside of the Penumbra: A Discussion of Hawai‘i's
Right to Privacy After State v. Mallan. 21 UH L. Rev. 273 (1999).

Case Notes

Not unconstitutional. 56 H. 271, 535 P.2d 1394 (1975); 61 H.
71, 595 P.2d 287 (1979).

Defense of medical necessity. 61 H. 71, 595 P.2d 287 (1979).

Identification of seeds as marijuana seeds required expert
testimony. 61 H. 505, 606 P.2d 913 (1980).

Purported right to possess and use marijuana not a
fundamental right; where defendant failed to prove section lacked any rational
basis, section constitutional. 86 H. 440, 950 P.2d 178 (1998).

Under the circumstances of the case, the free exercise clause
of the First Amendment was not a viable defense to prosecution under this
section; this section is a neutral law of general applicability to the extent
it purports to prohibit, without exception, the possession of marijuana and any
other substance defined as a "Schedule V substance" by chapter 329,
it does not interfere with other constitutional rights, and it does not create
a mechanism for governmental assessment of individual applicants for
exemptions. 115 H. 396, 168 P.3d 526. (2007)

Section did not burden defendant's free exercise of
religion. 5 H. App. 411, 695 P.2d 336 (1985).

Where insufficient evidence in record that defendant had the
necessary intent to exercise control and dominion over the marijuana, no
violation of section by "constructive possession". 92 H. 472 (App.),
992 P.2d 741 (1999).

Where a Hawaii county ordinance made the enforcement of
marijuana laws the lowest enforcement priority in the county, the ordinance was
preempted by state laws governing the investigation and prosecution of alleged
violations of the Hawaii Penal Code concerning the adult personal use of
cannabis. 132 H. 511 (App.), 323 P.3d 155 (2014).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next